Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 4
BALLOTS

1-5-401. Method of voting.

For all general, primary, congressional vacancy, coordinated, odd-year, and recall elections, and for any election in which the governing body of a political subdivision other than a county determines that an election shall be by mail ballot, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official for the political subdivision, as applicable, shall conduct the election by mail ballot; except that votes cast at voter service and polling centers may be by paper ballots or by electronic or electromechanical voting systems.

For any election that the governing body of a political subdivision determines will be an independent mail ballot election, the designated election official for that political subdivision shall conduct the election by mail ballot in accordance with article 13.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 707, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1343, § 5, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 710, § 40, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 3, § 2, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-401 (1) as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(2) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(3) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-5-402. Primary election ballots.

No later than thirty-two days before the primary election, the county clerk and recorder shall prepare a separate ballot for each political party. The ballots shall be printed in the following manner:

All official ballots shall be printed according to the provisions of sections 1-5-407 and 1-5-408; except that across the top of each ballot shall be printed the name of the political party for which the ballot is to be used.

The positions on the ballot shall be arranged as follows: First, candidates for United States senator; next, congressional candidates; next, state candidates; next, legislative candidates; next, district attorney candidates; next, other candidates for district offices greater than a county office; next, candidates for county commissioners; next, county clerk and recorder candidates; next, county treasurer candidates; next, county assessor candidates; next, county sheriff candidates; next, county surveyor candidates; and next, county coroner candidates. When other offices are to be filled at the coming general election, the county clerk and recorder, in preparing the primary ballot, shall use substantially the form prescribed by this section, stating the proper designation of the office and placing the names of the candidates for the office under the name of the office.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 707, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1766, § 6, effective June 6.

L. 99:

IP(1) amended, p. 774, § 46, effective May 20.

Initiated 2016:

(2) added, Proposition 108, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2825.

L. 2018:

(2) repealed, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1608, § 13, effective May 29.

1-5-403. Content of ballots for general and congressional vacancy elections.

The county clerk and recorder of each county using paper ballots or electronically counted ballot cards shall provide printed ballots for every odd-numbered year, general, or congressional vacancy election. The official ballots shall be printed and in the possession of the county clerk and recorder no later than thirty-two days before every odd-numbered year, congressional vacancy, and general election.

For all elections except those for presidential electors, every ballot shall contain the names of all candidates for offices to be voted for at that election whose nominations have been made and accepted, except those who have died or withdrawn, and the ballot shall contain no other names. When presidential electors are to be elected, their names shall not be printed on the ballot, but the names of the candidates of the respective political parties or political organizations for president and vice president of the United States shall be printed together in pairs under the title "presidential electors". The pairs shall be arranged in the alphabetical order of the names of the candidates for president in the manner provided for in section 1-5-404. A vote for any pair of candidates is a vote for the duly nominated presidential electors of the political party or political organization by which the pair of candidates were named.

The names of joint candidates of a political party or political organization for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be printed in pairs. The pairs shall be arranged in the alphabetical order of the names of candidates for governor in the manner provided for in section 1-5-404. A vote for any pair of candidates for governor and lieutenant governor is a vote for each of the candidates who compose that pair.

The name of each person nominated shall be printed or written upon the ballot in only one place. Each nominated person's name may include one nickname, if the person regularly uses the nickname and the nickname does not include any part of a political party name. Opposite the name of each person nominated, including candidates for president and vice president and joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor, shall be the name of the political party or political organization which nominated the candidate, expressed in not more than three words. Those three words may not promote the candidate or constitute a campaign promise.

The positions on the ballot shall be arranged as follows: First, candidates for president and vice president of the United States; next, candidates for United States senator; next, congressional candidates; next, joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor; next, other state candidates; next, legislative candidates; next, district attorney candidates; next, candidates for the board of directors of the regional transportation district; next, other candidates for district offices greater than a county office; next, candidates for county commissioners; next, county clerk and recorder candidates; next, county treasurer candidates; next, county assessor candidates; next, county sheriff candidates; next county surveyor candidates; and next, county coroner candidates. When other offices are to be filled, the county clerk and recorder, in preparing the ballot, shall use substantially the form prescribed by this section, stating the proper designation of the office and placing the names of the candidates for the office under the name of the office. The ballot issues concerning the retention in office of justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the district court, and judges of the county court shall be placed on the ballot in that order and shall precede the placement of ballot issues concerning amendment of the state constitution or pertaining to political subdivisions.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 708, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 184, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 774, § 47, effective May 20.

L. 2012:

(4) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 682, § 20, effective May 17.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-402 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For provision requiring joint election of governor and lieutenant governor, see § 1-4-204; for requirement that write-in candidate file affidavit of intent, see § 1-4-1101; for ballots for primary elections, see § 1-5-402; for printing and distribution of ballots, see § 1-5-410; for the furnishing of cards of instruction to election judges, see § 1-5-504; for the manner of voting in precincts which use paper ballots, see § 1-7-304; for ballots defectively marked, see § 1-7-309.

1-5-404. Arrangement of names on ballots for partisan elections.

In all partisan elections, the names of all candidates and joint candidates who have been duly nominated for office shall be arranged on the ballot under the designation of the office in three groups as follows:

The names of the candidates of the major political parties shall be placed on the general election ballot in an order established by lot and shall comprise the first group; except that the joint candidates for president and vice president and the joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor shall be arranged in the alphabetical order of the names of the candidates for president and governor.

The names of the candidates and joint candidates of the minor political parties shall be listed in an order established by lot and shall comprise the second group; except that the joint candidates for president and vice president and the joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor shall be arranged in the alphabetical order of the names of the candidates for president and governor.

The names of the candidates and joint candidates of the remaining political organizations shall be listed in an order established by lot and shall comprise the third group; except that the joint candidates for president and vice president and the joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor shall be arranged in the alphabetical order of the names of the candidates for president and governor.

Between July 1 and July 15 of each election year, the officer in receipt of the original designation, nomination, or petition of each candidate shall inform the major political parties, each minor political party that has nominated at least one candidate, and the representative of each political organization that has filed a nominating petition for at least one candidate of the time and place of the lot-drawing for offices to appear on the general election ballot. Ballot positions shall be assigned to the major political party, minor political party, or political organization in the order in which they are drawn. The name of the candidate shall be inserted on the ballot prior to the ballot certification.

The arrangement of names on ballots for congressional vacancy elections shall be established by lot at any time prior to the certification of ballots for the congressional vacancy election. The officer in receipt of the original designation, nomination, or petition of each candidate shall inform the major political parties, each minor political party, and the representatives of each political organization on file with the secretary of state of the time and place of the lot-drawing for the congressional election ballot. Ballot positions shall be assigned to the major political party, minor political party, or political organization in the order in which they are drawn.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 710, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1411, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 258, § 11, effective April 13.

L. 2012:

(1)(a), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 682, § 21, effective May 17.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3026, § 32, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-403 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-5-405. Arrangement of names on voting machines - testing of machines - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 710, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1412, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(4) added by revision, pp. 1361, 1213, §§ 30, 31, 108.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2006. (See L. 2004, pp. 1361, 1213.)

1-5-406. Content of ballots for nonpartisan elections.

The designated election official shall provide printed ballots for every election. The official ballots shall be printed and in the possession of the designated election official at least thirty days before the election. Every ballot shall contain the names of all duly nominated candidates for offices to be voted for at that election, except those who have died or withdrawn, and the ballot shall contain no other names. The arrangement of the names shall be established by lot at any time prior to the certification of the ballot. The designated election official shall notify the candidates of the time and place of the lot-drawing for the ballot. The drawing shall be performed by the designated election official or a designee. The names shall be printed on the ballot without political party designation.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 712, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1412, § 52, effective July 1.

1-5-407. Form of ballots.

All ballots must be uniform and of sufficient length and width to allow for the names of candidates, officers, ballot issues, and ballot questions to be printed in clear, plain type, with a space between the different columns on the ballot. On each ballot the endorsement "Official ballot for ......................" must be printed, and after the word "for" follows the designation of the precinct, if appropriate, and the political subdivision for which the ballot is prepared, the date of the election, and a facsimile of the signature of the election official. The ballot shall not contain any caption or other endorsement, except as provided in this section. The election official shall use the same quality and tint of paper, the same kind of type, and the same quality and tint of plain black ink for all ballots prepared for one election.

If the designated election official, in his or her discretion, elects to use ballot stubs, each ballot may have either one or two stubs to be divided into two spaces by two perforated or dotted lines. Each such space must be at least one inch wide. The top portion is called the stub and the next portion is called the duplicate stub. All ballots prepared under this paragraph (b) must be numbered consecutively. The same number must be printed on both the stub and the duplicate stub.

(1.5) Repealed.

(1.6) A ballot stub may be used, but is not required, for a ballot produced on demand, so long as the quantity of ballots produced for the election can be reconciled by the ballot processing method used by the voting system. Such ballots may contain printed and distinguishing marks, so long as secrecy in voting is protected.

The ballots shall be printed so as to give to each eligible elector a clear opportunity to designate his or her choice of candidates, joint candidates, ballot issues, and ballot questions by a mark as instructed. On the ballot may be printed words that will aid the elector, such as "vote for not more than one".

At the end of the list of candidates for each different office shall be one or more blank spaces in which the elector may write the name of any eligible person not printed on the ballot who has filed an affidavit of intent of write-in candidate pursuant to section 1-4-1101. The number of spaces provided shall be the lesser of the number of eligible electors who have properly filed an affidavit of intent of write-in candidate pursuant to section 1-4-1101 or the number of persons to be elected to the office. No such blank spaces shall be provided if no eligible elector properly filed an affidavit of intent of write-in candidate.

The names of the candidates for each office shall be arranged under the designation of the office as provided in section 1-5-404. The designated election official shall not print, in connection with any name, any title or degree designating the business or profession of the candidate. Each candidate's name may include one nickname, if the candidate regularly uses the nickname and the nickname does not include any part of a political party name.

(4.5) If no candidate has been duly nominated and no person has properly filed an affidavit of intent of write-in candidate for an office, the following text shall appear under the designation of the office: "There are no candidates for this office.".

Whenever the approval of a ballot issue or ballot question is submitted to the vote of the people, the ballot issue or question shall be printed upon the ballot following the lists of candidates. Except as otherwise provided in section 32-9-119.3 (2), C.R.S., referred amendments shall be printed first, followed by initiated amendments, referred propositions, initiated propositions, county issues and questions, municipal issues and questions, school district issues and questions, ballot issues and questions for other political subdivisions which are in more than one county, and then ballot issues and questions for other political subdivisions which are wholly within a county.

Beginning with the 2010 general election:

Each proposed change to the state constitution, whether initiated by the people or referred to the people by the general assembly, shall be identified on the ballot as an "amendment";

Each proposed change to the Colorado Revised Statutes, whether initiated by the people or referred to the people by the general assembly, shall be identified on the ballot as a "proposition"; and

A ballot issue or question containing both a proposed change to the state constitution and a proposed change to the Colorado Revised Statutes shall be identified on the ballot as an "amendment".

(5.3) (a) Commencing with the general election held in November 2010, each statewide measure initiated by the people that is a proposed change to the state constitution shall be numbered consecutively in regular numerical order beginning with the number sixty. Such consecutive numbering of measures shall continue at any odd-year or general election held after such election at which any such measure is on the ballot beginning with the number following the highest number utilized in the previous election until the number ninety-nine is utilized at an election for any such measure. Such measures shall again be numbered consecutively in regular numerical order beginning with the number one and in accordance with this paragraph (a) following the utilization of the number ninety-nine for any such measure. The secretary of state may promulgate rules as may be necessary to administer this paragraph (a). Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Commencing with the general election held in November 2010, each statewide measure initiated by the people that is a proposed change to the Colorado Revised Statutes shall be numbered consecutively in regular numerical order beginning with the number one hundred one. Such consecutive numbering of measures shall continue at any odd-year or general election held after such election at which any such measure is on the ballot beginning with the number following the highest number utilized in the previous election until the number one hundred ninety-nine is utilized at an election for any such measure. Such measures shall again be numbered consecutively in regular numerical order beginning with the number one hundred one and in accordance with this paragraph (b) following the utilization of the number one hundred ninety-nine for any such measure. The secretary of state may promulgate rules as may be necessary to administer this paragraph (b). Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

(5.4) (a) Commencing with the general election held in November 2010, each statewide measure referred to the people by the general assembly that is a proposed change to the state constitution shall be lettered consecutively in regular alphabetical order beginning with the letter P. The consecutive lettering of such statewide referred measures shall continue at any odd-year or general election held after the election at which any statewide referred measure is on the ballot beginning with the letter following the last letter utilized in the previous election until the letter Z is utilized at an election for such a statewide referred measure. Such statewide referred measures shall again be lettered consecutively in regular alphabetical order beginning with the letter A and in accordance with this paragraph (a) following the utilization of the letter Z for any such statewide referred measure. The secretary of state may promulgate rules as may be necessary to administer this paragraph (a). Any rules shall be promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Commencing with the general election held in November 2010, each statewide measure referred to the people by the general assembly that is a proposed change to the Colorado Revised Statutes shall be double-lettered consecutively in regular alphabetical order beginning with the letters AA. The consecutive lettering of such statewide referred measures shall continue at any odd-year or general election held after the election at which any statewide referred measure is on the ballot beginning with the letters following the last letters utilized in the previous election until the letters ZZ are utilized at an election for such a statewide referred measure. Such statewide referred measures shall again be lettered consecutively in regular alphabetical order beginning with the letters AA and in accordance with this paragraph (b) following the utilization of the letters ZZ for any such statewide referred measure. The secretary of state may promulgate rules as may be necessary to administer this paragraph (b). Any rules shall be promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

(5.5) The coordinated election official may choose to follow the provisions of subsection (5) of this section, or may choose to use separate ballots. If separate ballots are used, the candidates shall be listed first, followed by measures to increase taxes, measures to increase debt, citizen petitions, and referred measures.

Whenever candidates are to be voted for only by the eligible electors of a particular district, county, or other political subdivision, the names of those candidates shall not be printed on any ballots other than those provided for use in the district, county, or political subdivision in which those candidates are to be voted on.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective until proclamation of the governor. See editor's note following this section.] No printing or distinguishing marks shall be on the ballot except as specifically provided in this code, or in section 1-40-106 (3)(e) to (3)(g).

(7)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (7) is effective upon proclamation of the governor. See editor's note following this section.

]

No printing or distinguishing marks shall be on the ballot except as specifically provided in this code, or in section 1-40-106 (3)(e) to (3)(g) and (3)(j).

Repealed.

If a referred measure, including but not limited to a measure referred by the school board of a multicounty school district or the board of directors of a multicounty special district to the registered electors of the school district or special district, is referred to registered electors of multiple counties, the alphabetical, numerical, or alphanumerical designation used to identify the measure shall be identical on each ballot that includes the measure.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 712, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) and (5) amended and (5.5) added, p. 1412, § 53, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended and (8) added, p. 1161, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 1743, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 184, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2000:

(5.3) added, p. 299, § 8, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), (3), and (4) amended and (1.6) and (4.5) added, p. 1630, § 7, effective June 7.

L. 2005:

(5) amended and (5.4) and (9) added, p. 1265, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2009:

(5) amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 48, § 3, effective March 2; (5), (5.3), and (5.4) amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1167, § 1, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(5)(a) amended, (SB 10-216), ch. 413, p. 2041, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2012:

(4) and (5)(b) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 683, § 22, effective May 17.

L. 2014:

(1) and (1.6) amended and (1.5) and (8) repealed, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 560, § 12, effective May 9.

L. 2021:

(7) amended, (HB 21-1321), ch. 474, p. 3395, § 2, effective July 7.

L. 2022:

(7) amended, (SB 22-222), ch. 508, p. 4275, § 1, effective (see editor's note).

1-5-408. Form of ballots - electronic voting.

Ballot cards placed upon voting equipment shall, so far as practicable, be arranged as provided by sections 1-5-402, 1-5-403, and 1-5-404; except that they shall be of the size and design required by the voting equipment and may be printed on a number of separate ballot cards that are placed on the voting equipment.

If votes are recorded on a ballot card, a separate write-in ballot may be provided, which may be in the form of a paper ballot or envelope on which the elector may write in the title of the office and the name of a qualified write-in candidate.

Polling locations that use electromechanical voting systems may use ballot cards of different colors to ensure that electors receive a full ballot. Such polling locations may also use ballot cards of different colors for each party at primary elections.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 713, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

(4) amended, p. 185, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1344, § 6, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

(3) amended and (4) repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 711, § 41, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-405 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsections (1), (3), and (4), see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(2) In 2013, subsection (3) was amended and subsection (4) was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-409. Single cross mark for party slate not permitted.

Each office in every election shall be voted upon separately, and no emblem, device, or political party designation shall be used on the official ballot at any election by which an eligible elector may vote for more than one office by placing a single cross mark on the ballot or by writing in the name of any political party or political organization.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 714, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-406 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-5-410. Printing and distribution of ballots.

In political subdivisions using paper ballots or electronic ballot cards, the designated election official shall have a sufficient number of ballots printed and distributed to the election judges in the respective polling locations.

This section does not apply to any election in which a ballot-on-demand system is used.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 714, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 711, § 42, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-407 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-411. Substitute ballots.

If the ballots to be furnished to any election judges are not delivered at the time and in the manner required in section 1-5-410 or if after delivery they are destroyed or stolen, it shall be the duty of the designated election official to cause other ballots to be prepared, as nearly in the form prescribed as practicable, with the words "substitute ballot" printed on each ballot. Upon receipt of the ballots thus prepared from the designated election official, accompanied by a statement under oath that the designated election official prepared and furnished the substitute ballots and that the original ballots have not been received or have been destroyed or stolen, the election judges shall cause the substitute ballots to be used at the election. If from any cause neither the official ballots nor the substitute ballots are ready in time to be distributed for the election or if the supply of ballots is exhausted before the polls are closed, unofficial ballots, printed or written, made as nearly as possible in the form of the official ballots, may be used until substitutes prepared by the designated election official can be printed and delivered.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 715, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-408 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-5-412. Correction of errors.

The designated election official shall correct without delay any errors in publication or in sample or official ballots which are discovered or brought to the official's attention and which can be corrected without interfering with the timely distribution of the ballots.

When it appears by verified petition of a candidate or the candidate's agent to any district court that any error or omission has occurred in the publication of the names or description of the candidates or in the printing of sample or official election ballots which has been brought to the attention of the designated election official and has not been corrected, the court shall issue an order requiring the designated election official to correct the error forthwith or to show cause why the error should not be corrected. Costs, including reasonable attorney fees, may be assessed in the discretion of the court against either party.

If, before the date set for election, a duly nominated candidate withdraws by filing an affidavit of withdrawal with the designated election official, or dies and the fact of the death becomes known to the designated election official before the ballots are printed, or is deemed disqualified, the name of the candidate shall not be printed on the ballots. Except in the case of a vacancy to be filled in accordance with section 1-4-1005, 1-4-1006, or 1-4-1009, if the ballots are already printed, the votes cast for the withdrawn, deceased, or disqualified candidate are invalid and shall not be counted.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 715, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 934, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 1975, § 17, effective August 3.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 963, § 9, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-409 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For taxing reasonable attorney fees in favor of the defendant when an action is vexatiously commenced, see C.R.C.P. 3(a).

1-5-413. Sample ballots.

Sample ballots must be printed in the form of official ballots, but must be clearly marked as "SAMPLE BALLOT". Sample ballots must be delivered to the election judges and posted with the cards of instruction provided for in section 1-5-504. All sample ballots are subject to public inspection.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 716, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 579, § 41, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-410 as it existed prior to 1992.